District of Columbia statutes.
24-715

Release of patients.

For purposes of §§ 24-713 to 24-715, an individual shall be deemed cured of his addiction, drug abuse, or drug dependence and rehabilitated if the Surgeon General determines that he has received the maximum benefits of treatment and care by the Service for his addiction, drug abuse, or drug dependence or if the Surgeon General determines that his further treatment and care for such purpose would be detrimental to the interests of the Service.

History

July 1, 1944, ch. 373, title III, § 347
May 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 81, ch. 195, § 4
Oct. 27, 1970, 84 Stat. 1240, Pub. L. 91-513, title I. § 2(a)(4)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-615.
1973 Ed., § 24-615.